Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-3529
Legislative intent.

It is the intent of the Legislature that costs incurred by the State of Nebraska attributable to the calibration of radiological instruments be borne by the responsible agency and to provide state and local governmental agencies a cost-effective source for the calibration of radiological instruments without infringing on commercial resources within the State of Nebraska.

Laws 2006, LB 787, § 1.